New York, session 2025-2026, A9600.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (a) of section 30.02 of the mental hygiene law, 2 as added by section 9 of part AA of chapter 56 of the laws of 2020, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (a) "Eating disorder" is defined to include, but not be limited to, 5 conditions such as anorexia nervosa, bulimia [and], binge eating disor- 6 der and avoidant/restrictive food intake disorder, identified as such in 7 the [ICD-9-CM] most current edition of the International Classification 8 of Disease or [the most current edition of the] Diagnostic and Statis- 9 tical Manual of Mental Disorders, or other medical and mental health 10 diagnostic references generally accepted for standard use by the medical 11 and mental health fields. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14438-02-6